Utah statutes.
39-6-47.   Military court records.
(1) (a)  Each military court shall maintain a separate record of the
proceedings in each case brought before it.  The record shall be authenticated
by the signature of the military judge.
(b)  If the record cannot be authenticated by the military judge due to his
death, disability, or absence, it shall be authenticated by the signature of
the trial counsel.  If the trial counsel is unable to authenticate due to his
death, disability, or absence, a member of the court panel shall authenticate
the record by his signature.
(c)  In a court of only a military judge, the record shall be authenticated by
the court reporter under the same conditions that a member of a court would
authenticate under this section, if the proceedings have resulted in an
acquittal of all charges and specifications or, if not affecting a general or
flag officer, in a sentence not including discharge and not in excess of that
which may be prescribed by regulations of the governor.
(2)  A copy of the record of the proceedings of each court shall be given to
the accused as soon as it is authenticated.  The expense in preparing and
transmitting the record shall be by regulations prescribed by the governor or
the adjutant general.
